Maine, session 132, LD1526.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §223-A, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 416, §5 and affected
by §9, is amended to read:
8. Restrictions on use of consumer fireworks. The use of consumer fireworks is
governed by this subsection.
A. Consumer fireworks may be used between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m.
9:00 p.m., except that on the following dates they may be used between the hours of
9:00 a.m. and 12:30 a.m. the following day:
(1) July 4th;
(2) December 31st; and
(3) The weekends immediately before and after July 4th and December 31st.
B. A person may use consumer fireworks only on that person's property or on the
property of a person who has consented to the use of consumer fireworks on that
property.
A person who violates this subsection commits a civil violation for which a fine of not less
than $50 $100 and not more than $500 $1,000, plus court costs, may be adjudged for any
one offense.